Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2726YC (1) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321E.12, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. A vehicle traveling under permit shall be registered 3 for the gross weight of the vehicle and load. A trip permit 4 issued according to section 326.23 shall not be used in lieu of 5 the registration provided for in this section . 6 b. For purposes of this section, a vehicle traveling 7 under a single-trip permit issued under section 321E.9 may be 8 registered with the department for the combined gross weight 9 of the vehicle and load on a single-trip basis. The fee for 10 single-trip registration is four dollars per ton exceeding 11 forty tons. 12